Hawaii statutes.
ARTICLE 3.
[OLD]

COMMERCIAL
PAPER

REPEALED. L 1991, c 118, §5.

ARTICLE 3.

NEGOTIABLE
INSTRUMENTS

PART 1.
GENERAL PROVISIONS AND DEFINITIONS

§490:3-101 Short title. This article
may be cited as Uniform Commercial Code--Negotiable Instruments. [L 1991, c
118, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next